Hawaii statutes.
[ARTICLE
13.] THE HAWAII INTERNATIONAL BANKING ACT

PART I.
GENERAL

[§412:13-100] Title and purpose. (a)
This article shall be known and may be cited as the Hawaii International
Banking Act.

(b) This article is intended generally to
provide for state regulation of the participation by foreign banks in the
financial markets of this State.

(c) Consistent with the federal International
Banking Act, the Bank Holding Company Act, the Federal Deposit Insurance Act,
and the Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act, this article is
intended specifically:

(1) To authorize banking activities and operations,
under state licenses issued by the commissioner, of direct branch and agency
offices in this State of foreign banks, generally under terms and conditions
not less favorable than the terms and conditions under which the activities and
operations may be conducted by federal branch or agency offices of foreign
banks in the United States, and to set forth a statutory framework for the
licensing, regulation, and supervision of the State-licensed offices of foreign
banks by the commissioner to assure the safe and sound operation of the offices
that are licensed under the laws of this State;

(2) To authorize representative offices in this State
of foreign banks, and to set forth statutory provisions governing the licensing
and supervision of the representative offices by the commissioner; and

(3) To ensure that the banking laws and rules of this
State otherwise apply to foreign banks in a manner consistent with the laws and
policies of the United States governing the operations in this country of
foreign banks. [L 1996, c 155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next